Arkansas, session 2025, HB1934.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Forward
Engagement Committee Act".

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) A comprehensive review of state spending and regulation is
necessary to:
(A) Identify and eliminate waste, fraud, and abuse;
(B) Improve operational efficiencies; and
(C) Optimize the use of public resources; and
(2) Outdated, duplicative, and unnecessary regulations can
impose undue burdens on businesses and individuals, hindering economic
development.
*JLL364*
03/31/2025 2:33:57 PM JLL364

HB1934
(b) The General Assembly intends for this act to:
(1) Promote governmental efficiency;
(2) Foster a regulatory environment that supports economic
growth and a more business-friendly climate within the State of Arkansas; and
(3) Establish a working group tasked with identifying
inefficiencies in government spending and reviewing regulatory policies that
unnecessarily restrict economic growth.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Arkansas Forward
Engagement Committee working group.
(a) There is established the Arkansas Forward Engagement Committee
working group.
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(5)(B) of this section,
the working group shall be composed of the following members:
(A) The Secretary of the Department of Shared
Administrative Services, who shall serve as the chair of the working group;
(B) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration;
(C) The Secretary of the Department of Commerce;
(D) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services;
(E) The Secretary of the Department of Inspector General;
(F) The State Personnel Administrator;
(G) Two (2) members appointed by the Secretary of the
Department of Shared Administrative Services;
(H)(i) Two (2) members of the House of Representatives
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(ii) The members appointed under subdivision
(b)(1)(H)(i) of this section serve at the pleasure of the Speaker of the
House of Representatives; and
(I)(i) Two (2) members of the Senate appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
(ii) The members appointed under subdivision
(b)(1)(I)(i) of this section serve at the pleasure of the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate.
(2)(A) The members listed in subdivisions (b)(1)(A)–(G) of this
section serve at the pleasure of the Governor.
03/31/2025 2:33:57 PM JLL364

HB1934
(B) The Governor may recommend the removal or replacement
of any member of the working group.
(3) The Governor shall call the first meeting of the working
group no later than September 1, 2025.
(4)(A) The working group shall meet quarterly.
(B) The working group may meet more often as necessary to
accomplish its goals under this section at the call of the chair.
(5)(A) Except as provided under subdivision (b)(5)(B) of this
section, if a vacancy occurs on the working group, the vacancy shall be
filled in the same manner as the original appointment.
(B) A vacancy in a position listed in subdivisions
(b)(1)(A)–(F) of this section shall be filled by appointment by the Governor.
(6) A majority of the voting members of the working group shall
constitute a quorum for transacting any business of the working group.
(7) A member of the General Assembly appointed as a member of
the working group under this section shall serve as a nonvoting advisory
member of the working group.
(8) A member of the working group shall serve without
compensation, reimbursement of expenses, or per diem for his or her duties on
the working group.
(9) The Department of Shared Administrative Services shall
provide staff for the working group.
(c)(1) The working group shall conduct a comprehensive review of state
government spending and regulation to identify inefficiencies, opportunities
for resource optimization, and unnecessary or burdensome regulations.
(2)(A)(i) The working group shall accept public submissions
regarding waste, fraud, and inefficiencies in government spending or
regulatory processes.
(ii) The Department of Shared Administrative
Services shall create a mechanism for the acceptance of public submissions
under subdivision (c)(2)(A)(i) of this section.
(B) The working group shall consider and include public
submissions received by the working group under this subsection in the final
report of the working group.
(d) The working group shall submit a final report of its findings and
recommendations to the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the
03/31/2025 2:33:57 PM JLL364

HB1934
President Pro Tempore of the Senate no later than July 1, 2026.
(e)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(2) of this section, the
working group is abolished on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Governor may extend the operations of the working group
so that the working group is abolished on January 1, 2029.































03/31/2025 2:33:57 PM JLL364